North Dakota, session 69, SB2393.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 53-06.1-11.2 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
53-06.1-11.2. Charitable gaming operating fund - Attorney general - State treasurer -
Allocations - Transfer to the general fund.
1. There is created in the state treasury the charitable gaming operating fund. The fund
consists of all gaming taxes, monetary fines, and interest and penalties collected
under this chapter.
2. Excluding moneys in the charitable gaming operating fund appropriated by the
legislative assembly for administrative and operating costs associated with charitable
gaming, the attorney general shall allocate remaining moneys in the charitable gaming
operating fund on a quarterly basis as follows:
a. Ten thousandThirty-three thousand five hundred dollars to the gambling disorder
prevention and treatment fund for gambling disorder prevention and treatment
activities, including funding for department of health and human services staff.
b. Subject to legislative appropriations, five percent of the total moneys deposited in
the charitable gaming operating fund to cities and counties in proportion to the
taxes collected under section 53-06.1-12 from licensed organizations conducting
games within each city, for sites within city limits, or within each county, for sites
outside city limits. If a city or county allocation is less than two hundred dollars,
Page No. 1 25.1341.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
that city or county is not entitled to receive a payment for the quarter and the
undistributed amount must be included in the total amount to be distributed to
other cities and counties for the quarter.
3. On or before June thirtieth of each odd-numbered year, the attorney general shall
certify to the state treasurer the amount of accumulated funds in the charitable gaming
operating fund which exceed the amount appropriated by the legislative assembly for
administrative and operating costs associated with charitable gaming for the
subsequent biennium. The state treasurer shall transfer the certified amount from the
charitable gaming operating fund to the general fund prior to the end of each
biennium.
SECTION 2. FULL-TIME EQUIVALENT POSITION AUTHORIZATION - DEPARTMENT
OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES - GAMBLING DISORDER PREVENTION AND
TREATMENT FUND. The department of health and human services is authorized one full-time
equivalent position for gambling disorder prevention and treatment activities, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
Page No. 2 25.1341.01000